Washington statutes.
RCW 6.25.160

Sheriff's inventory—Return.

The sheriff shall make a full inventory of the property attached and return the inventory with the writ of attachment within twenty days of receipt of the writ, with a return of the proceedings indorsed on or attached to the writ. If the writ was issued at the same time as the summons, the sheriff shall return the writ with the summons.

[ 1987 c 442 s 816; 1927 c 100 s 2; 1886 p 43 s 21; RRS s 666. Prior: Code 1881 ss 174-192; 1877 pp 35-40; 1873 pp 43-50; 1871 pp 9, 10; 1869 pp 41-47; 1863 pp 112-120; 1860 pp 30-36; 1854 pp 155-162. Formerly RCW 7.12.200.]